California statutes. Corporations Code
(a) Upon merger pursuant to this chapter the separate existence of the disappearing corporations ceases and the surviving corporation shall succeed, without other transfer, to all the rights and property of each of the disappearing corporations and shall be subject to all the debts and liabilities of each in the same manner as if the surviving corporation had itself incurred them.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), a surviving corporation may succeed without the payment of any
 local agency transfer fee to all licenses, permits, registrations, and other privileges granted by any local agency provided the merger does not result in a change of ownership. Examples of mergers that do not result in a change of ownership are mergers between any of the following: (1) a corporation and its wholly owned subsidiary; (2) a corporation and the wholly owned subsidiary of that corporation’s wholly owned subsidiary; or (3) two wholly owned subsidiaries of the same parent corporation. The surviving corporation shall be subject to the same duties and obligations in connection with the license, permit, registration, or other privileges acquired from the disappearing corporations.

(c) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of each of the constituent corporations shall be preserved unimpaired, provided that any liens upon property of a disappearing corporation shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately
 prior to the time the merger is effective.

(d) Any action or proceeding pending by or against any disappearing corporation may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall bind the surviving corporation, or the surviving corporation may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(e) Nothing in subdivision (b) shall limit or restrict a tax assessor from reassessing real property upon transfer of title. Privileges granted by any local agency do not include property tax assessments.

(f) Nothing in subdivision (b) shall limit or restrict a local agency from reevaluating privileges received by a successor corporation from disappearing corporations if the local agency determines in its sole discretion that the reevaluation is necessary for public health, safety, or welfare purposes.

(g) For purposes of this section, “local agency” means a county, city, city and county, political subdivision, district, or municipal corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 381, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1107.5.

(a) Upon merger pursuant to this chapter, a surviving domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity shall be deemed to have assumed the liability of each disappearing domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity that is taxed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of, or under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of, Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the following:

(1) To prepare and file, or to cause to be prepared and filed, tax
 and information returns otherwise required of that disappearing entity as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18501) of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) To pay any tax liability determined to be due.

(b) If the surviving entity is a domestic limited liability company, domestic corporation, or registered limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability company, foreign limited liability partnership, or foreign corporation that is registered or qualified to do business in California, the Secretary of State shall notify the Franchise Tax Board of the merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1108.

(a) The merger of any number of domestic corporations with any number of foreign corporations may be effected if the foreign corporations are authorized by the laws under which they are formed to effect the merger. The surviving corporation may be any one of the constituent corporations and shall continue to exist under the laws of the state or place of its incorporation.

(b) If the surviving corporation is a domestic corporation, the merger proceedings with respect to that
 corporation and any domestic disappearing corporation shall conform to the provisions of this chapter governing the merger of domestic corporations, but if the surviving corporation is a foreign corporation, then, subject to the requirements of subdivision (d) and of Section 407 and Chapters 12 (commencing with Section 1200) and 13 (commencing with Section 1300) (with respect to any domestic constituent corporations), the merger proceedings may be in accordance with the laws of the state or place of incorporation of the surviving corporation.

(c) If the surviving corporation is a domestic corporation, the agreement and the officers’ certificate of each domestic or foreign constituent corporation shall be filed as provided in Section 1103, or the certificate of ownership shall be filed as provided in Section 1110, and thereupon, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 110, the merger shall be effective as to each domestic constituent corporation;
 and each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall by virtue of the filing, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 110, automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business.

(d) If the surviving corporation is a foreign corporation, the merger shall become effective in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which it is organized, but, except as provided in subdivision (e), the merger shall be effective as to any domestic disappearing corporation as of the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction upon the filing in this state as required by this subdivision. There shall be filed as to the domestic disappearing corporation or corporations the documents described in any one of the following paragraphs:

(1) A copy of the agreement, certificate or other document filed by the surviving foreign
 corporation in the state or place of its incorporation for the purpose of effecting the merger, which copy shall be certified by the public officer having official custody of the original.

(2) An executed counterpart of the agreement, certificate or other document filed by the surviving foreign corporation in the state or place of its incorporation for the purpose of effecting the merger.

(3) A copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of the surviving foreign corporation and of each constituent domestic corporation attached, which officers’ certificates shall conform to the requirements of Section 1103.

(4) A certificate of ownership pursuant to Section 1110.

(e) If the date of the filing in this state pursuant to subdivision (d) is
 more than six months after the time of the effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, or if the powers of the domestic corporation are suspended at the time of effectiveness in the foreign jurisdiction, the merger shall be effective as to the domestic disappearing corporation or corporations as of the date of filing in this state. Each foreign disappearing corporation that is qualified for the transaction of intrastate business shall, by virtue of the filing pursuant to subdivision (d), automatically surrender its right to transact intrastate business as of the date of filing in this state regardless of the time of effectiveness as to a domestic disappearing corporation.

(f) The provisions of the last two sentences of Section 1101 and Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200) and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) apply to the rights of the shareholders of any of the constituent corporations that are domestic corporations and of any
 domestic corporation that is a parent party of any foreign constituent corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1109.

Whenever a domestic or foreign corporation or domestic or foreign other business entity having any real property in this state merges or consolidates with another domestic or foreign corporation or other business entity pursuant to the laws of this state or of the state or place in which any constituent party to the merger was incorporated or organized, and the laws of the state or place of incorporation or organization (including this state) of any disappearing party to the merger provide substantially that the making and filing of the agreement of merger or
 consolidation or certificate of ownership or certificate of merger vests in the surviving or consolidated party to the merger all the real property of any disappearing party to the merger, the filing for record in the office of the county recorder of any county in this state in which any of the real property of that disappearing party to the merger is located of a copy of the agreement of merger or consolidation or certificate of ownership or certificate of merger, certified by the Secretary of State or an authorized public official of the state or place pursuant to the laws of which the merger or consolidation is effected, shall evidence record ownership in the surviving or consolidated party to the merger, of all interest of the disappearing party to the merger in and to the real property located in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 437, Sec. 9.5.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1110.

(a) If a domestic corporation owns all the outstanding shares, or owns less than all the outstanding shares but at least 90 percent of the outstanding shares of each class, of a corporation or corporations, domestic or foreign, the merger of the subsidiary corporation or corporations into the parent corporation or the merger into the subsidiary corporation of the parent corporation and any other subsidiary corporation or corporations, may be effected by a resolution or plan of merger adopted and approved by the board of the parent corporation
 and the filing of a certificate of ownership as provided in subdivision (e). The resolution or plan of merger shall provide for the merger and shall provide that the surviving corporation assumes all the liabilities of each disappearing corporation and shall include any other provisions required by this section.

(b) If the parent corporation owns less than all the outstanding shares but at least 90 percent of the outstanding shares of each class of the subsidiary corporation that is a party to the merger, the resolution or plan of merger also shall set forth the securities, cash, property, or rights to be issued, paid, delivered, or granted upon surrender of each outstanding share of the subsidiary corporation not owned by the parent corporation and the entire resolution or plan of merger as well as the consideration to be received for each share of the subsidiary corporation not owned by the parent corporation, shall be approved by the board
 of that subsidiary corporation.

(c) If the parent corporation is to be merged into one of its subsidiary corporations, the resolution or plan of merger also shall provide for the pro rata conversion of the outstanding shares of the parent corporation into shares of the surviving subsidiary corporation. In this case, the entire resolution or plan of merger shall be approved by the board of the surviving subsidiary corporation and, if the merger, but for the operation of this section, would be a merger reorganization (Section 181) the principal terms of which would be required to be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of any class of the parent corporation pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 1201, the principal terms of the resolution or plan of merger shall be approved by the outstanding shares (Section 152) of that same class of the parent corporation.

(d) In any
 merger pursuant to this section, the resolution or plan of merger may provide for the amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation to change its name, subject to Section 201, regardless of whether the name so adopted is the same as or similar to that of one of the disappearing corporations. The provision shall establish the wording of the amendment pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 907 and the resolution or plan of merger shall not provide for the amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation other than to change its name.

(e) After the required approval or approvals of the resolution or plan of merger, a certificate of ownership consisting of an officers’ certificate of the parent corporation shall be filed, and a copy thereof for each domestic subsidiary corporation and qualified foreign disappearing subsidiary corporation which is a party to the merger shall also be filed. The certificate of ownership
 shall:

(1) Identify the parent and subsidiary corporation or corporations.

(2) Set forth the share ownership by the parent corporation of each subsidiary corporation as 100 percent of the outstanding shares or as at least 90 percent of the outstanding shares of each class, as the case may be.

(3) Set forth the resolution or plan of merger.

(4) Set forth approval of the resolution or plan of merger by the board of the parent corporation.

(5) Set forth other approvals of the resolution or plan of merger as required under subdivision (b) or (c), if applicable.

(f) Upon the filing of the certificate of ownership, the merger shall
 be effective and any amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation set forth in the certificate shall be effective.

(g) A merger pursuant to this section may be effected if the parent corporation is a foreign corporation and if at least one subsidiary corporation is a domestic corporation but in such a case the certificate of ownership prepared as in subdivision (e) or the document required by subdivision (d) of Section 1108 shall be filed as to each domestic and qualified foreign subsidiary corporation, but no filing shall be made as to the foreign parent corporation. No merger into or with a foreign corporation may be effected as provided by this section unless the laws of the state or place of its incorporation permit that action.

(h) In the event all of the outstanding shares of a subsidiary domestic corporation party to a merger effected under this section are not
 owned by the parent corporation immediately prior to the merger, the parent corporation shall, at least 20 days before the effective date of the merger, give notice to each shareholder of such subsidiary corporation that the merger will become effective on or after a specified date. The notice shall contain a copy of the resolution or plan of merger and the information required by subdivision (a) of Section 1301. The notice shall be sent by mail addressed to the shareholder at the address of the shareholder as it appears on the records of the corporation. The shareholder shall have the right to demand payment of cash for the shares of the shareholder pursuant to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300).

(i) If an agreement of merger is entered into between a parent corporation and one or more of its subsidiary corporations and the share ownership requirements of subdivision (a) are met, the agreement of merger may be filed as a plan of merger
 with a certificate of ownership in accordance with the requirements of this section, in which case Sections 1101, 1102, 1103, 1200, 1201, and 1202 shall not apply; or the agreement of merger may be filed pursuant to Section 1103, in which case this section shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 773, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1111.

If any disappearing corporation in a merger is a close corporation and the surviving corporation is not a close corporation, the merger shall be approved by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of each class of the outstanding shares of such disappearing corporation; provided, however, that the articles may provide for a lesser vote, but not less than a majority of the outstanding shares of each class.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 641.)
-------------------------------------------

1112.

If a disappearing corporation in a merger is a corporation governed by this division and the surviving corporation is a nonprofit public benefit corporation, a nonprofit mutual benefit corporation, or a nonprofit religious corporation, the merger shall be approved by all of the outstanding shares of all classes of the disappearing corporation, regardless of limitations or restrictions on the voting rights thereof, notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200).

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

1112.5.

If a disappearing corporation in a merger is a corporation governed by this division and the surviving corporation is a social purpose corporation, both of the following shall apply:

(a) The merger shall be approved by the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of each class, or a greater vote if required in the articles, of the outstanding shares (Section 152) of the disappearing corporation, notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200).

(b) The shareholders of the disappearing corporation shall have all of the rights under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of the shareholders of a corporation involved in a reorganization requiring the
 approval of its outstanding shares (Section 152), and the disappearing corporation shall have all of the obligations under Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300) of a corporation involved in the reorganization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 694, Sec. 6.   (SB 1301)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1113.

(a) Any one or more corporations may merge with one or more other business entities (Section 174.5). One or more domestic corporations (Section 167) not organized under this division and one or more foreign corporations (Section 171) may be parties to the merger. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the merger of any number of corporations with any number of other business entities may be effected only if:

(1) In a merger in which a domestic corporation not organized under this division or a domestic other business entity is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(2) In a merger in which a foreign
 corporation is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(3) In a merger in which a foreign other business entity is a party, it is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(b) Each corporation and each other party that desires to merge shall approve, and shall be a party to, an agreement of merger. Other persons, including a parent party (Section 1200), may be parties to the agreement of merger. The board of each corporation that desires to merge and, if required, the shareholders shall approve the agreement of merger. The agreement of merger shall be approved on behalf of each party by those persons required to approve the merger by the laws under which it is organized. The agreement of merger shall state:

(1) The terms and conditions of
 the merger.

(2) The name and place of incorporation or organization of each party to the merger and the identity of the surviving party.

(3) The amendments, if any, subject to Sections 900 and 907, to the articles of the surviving corporation, if applicable, to be effected by the merger. If any amendment changes the name of the surviving corporation, if applicable, the new name may be, subject to subdivision (b) of Section 201, the same as or similar to the name of a disappearing party to the merger.

(4) The manner of converting the shares of each constituent corporation into shares, interests, or other securities of the surviving party. If any shares of any constituent corporation are not to be converted solely into shares, interests, or other securities of the surviving party, the agreement of merger shall state
 (A) the cash, rights, securities, or other property which the holders of those shares are to receive in exchange for the shares, which cash, rights, securities, or other property may be in addition to or in lieu of shares, interests, or other securities of the surviving party, or (B) that the shares are canceled without consideration.

(5) Any other details or provisions required by the laws under which any party to the merger is organized, including, if a public benefit corporation or a religious corporation is a party to the merger, Section 6019.1, or, if a mutual benefit corporation is a party to the merger, Section 8019.1, or, if a consumer cooperative corporation is a party to the merger, Section 12540.1, or if an unincorporated association is a party to the merger, Section 18370, or, if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, Section 15911.12, or, if a domestic partnership is a party to the merger, Section 16911, or, if a
 domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, Section 17710.12.

(6) Any other details or provisions as are desired, including, without limitation, a provision for the payment of cash in lieu of fractional shares or for any other arrangement with respect thereto consistent with the provisions of Section 407.

(c) Each share of the same class or series of any constituent corporation (other than the cancellation of shares held by a party to the merger or its parent, or a wholly owned subsidiary of either, in another constituent corporation) shall, unless all shareholders of the class or series consent and except as provided in Section 407, be treated equally with respect to any distribution of cash, rights, securities, or other property. Notwithstanding paragraph (4) of subdivision (b), the unredeemable common shares of a constituent corporation may be converted only
 into unredeemable common shares of a surviving corporation or a parent party (Section 1200) or unredeemable equity securities of a surviving party other than a corporation if another party to the merger or its parent owns, directly or indirectly, prior to the merger shares of that corporation representing more than 50 percent of the voting power of that corporation, unless all of the shareholders of the class consent and except as provided in Section 407.

(d) Notwithstanding its prior approval, an agreement of merger may be amended prior to the filing of the agreement of merger or the certificate of merger, as is applicable, if the amendment is approved by the board of each constituent corporation and, if the amendment changes any of the principal terms of the agreement, by the outstanding shares (Section 152), if required by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200), in the same manner as the original agreement of merger. If the agreement of
 merger as so amended and approved is also approved by each of the other parties to the agreement of merger, the agreement of merger as so amended shall then constitute the agreement of merger.

(e) The board of a constituent corporation may, in its discretion, abandon a merger, subject to the contractual rights, if any, of third parties, including other parties to the agreement of merger, without further approval by the outstanding shares (Section 152), at any time before the merger is effective.

(f) Each constituent corporation shall sign the agreement of merger by its chairperson of the board, president or a vice president, and also by its secretary or an assistant secretary acting on behalf of their respective corporations.

(g) (1) If the surviving party is a corporation or a foreign
 corporation, or if a social purpose corporation (Section 171.08), a public benefit corporation (Section 5060), a mutual benefit corporation (Section 5059), a religious corporation (Section 5061), or a corporation organized under the Consumer Cooperative Corporation Law (Section 12200) is a party to the merger, after required approvals of the merger by each constituent corporation through approval of the board (Section 151) and any approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152) required by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200) and by the other parties to the merger, the surviving party shall file a copy of the agreement of merger with an officers’ certificate of each constituent domestic and foreign corporation attached stating the total number of outstanding shares or membership interests of each class entitled to vote on the merger (and identifying any other person or persons whose approval is required), that the agreement of merger in the form attached or its principal terms, as required, were
 approved by that corporation by a vote of a number of shares or membership interests of each class that equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class and, if applicable, by that other person or persons whose approval is required, or that the merger agreement was entitled to be and was approved by the board alone (as provided in Section 1201, in the case of corporations subject to that section). If equity securities of a parent party (Section 1200) are to be issued in the merger, the officers’ certificate of that controlled party shall state either that no vote of the shareholders of the parent party was required or that the required vote was obtained. In lieu of an officers’ certificate, a certificate of merger, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, shall be filed for each constituent other business entity. The certificate of merger shall be executed and acknowledged by each domestic constituent limited liability company
 by all managers of the limited liability company (unless a lesser number is specified in its articles of organization or operating agreement) and by each domestic constituent limited partnership by all general partners (unless a lesser number is provided in its certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement) and by each domestic constituent general partnership by two partners (unless a lesser number is provided in its partnership agreement) and by each foreign constituent limited liability company by one or more managers and by each foreign constituent general partnership or foreign constituent limited partnership by one or more general partners, and by each constituent reciprocal insurer by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary, or, if a constituent reciprocal insurer has not appointed those officers, by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary of the constituent
 reciprocal insurer’s attorney-in-fact, and by each other party to the merger by those persons required or authorized to execute the certificate of merger by the laws under which that party is organized, specifying for that party the provision of law or other basis for the authority of the signing persons. The certificate of merger shall set forth, if a vote of the shareholders, members, partners, or other holders of interests of the constituent other business entity was required, a statement setting forth the total number of outstanding interests of each class entitled to vote on the merger and that the agreement of merger in the form attached or its principal terms, as required, were approved by a vote of the number of interests of each class that equaled or exceeded the vote required, specifying each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class, and any other information required to be set forth under the laws under which the constituent other business entity is organized,
 including, if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14, if a domestic partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (b) of Section 16915, and, if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 17710.04. The certificate of merger for each constituent foreign other business entity, if any, shall also set forth the statutory or other basis under which that foreign other business entity is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger. The merger and any amendment of the articles of the surviving corporation, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger shall be effective upon filing of the agreement of merger with an officer’s certificate of each constituent domestic and foreign corporation and a certificate of merger for each constituent other business entity, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 110 and subject to the provisions of subdivision (j), and the several parties
 thereto shall be one entity. If a domestic reciprocal insurer organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance is a party to the merger, the agreement of merger or certificate of merger shall not be filed until there has been filed the certificate issued by the Insurance Commissioner approving the merger pursuant to Section 1555 of the Insurance Code. The Secretary of State may certify a copy of the agreement of merger separate from the officers’ certificates and certificates of merger attached thereto.

(2) If the surviving entity is an other business entity, and no public benefit corporation (Section 5060), mutual benefit corporation (Section 5059), religious corporation (Section 5061), or corporation organized under the Consumer Cooperative Corporation Law (Section 12200) is a party to the merger, after required approvals of the merger by each constituent corporation through approval of the board (Section 151) and any approval of
 the outstanding shares (Section 152) required by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200) and by the other parties to the merger, the parties to the merger shall file a certificate of merger in the office of, and on a form prescribed by, the Secretary of State. The certificate of merger shall be executed and acknowledged by each constituent domestic and foreign corporation by its chairperson of the board, president or a vice president, and also by its secretary or an assistant secretary and by each domestic constituent limited liability company by all managers of the limited liability company (unless a lesser number is specified in its articles of organization or operating agreement) and by each domestic constituent limited partnership by all general partners (unless a lesser number is provided in its certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement) and by each domestic constituent general partnership by two partners (unless a lesser number is provided in its partnership agreement) and by each
 foreign constituent limited liability company by one or more managers and by each foreign constituent general partnership or foreign constituent limited partnership by one or more general partners, and by each constituent reciprocal insurer by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary, or, if a constituent reciprocal insurer has not appointed those officers, by the chairperson of the board, president, or vice president, and by the secretary or assistant secretary of the constituent reciprocal insurer’s attorney-in-fact. The certificate of merger shall be signed by each other party to the merger by those persons required or authorized to execute the certificate of merger by the laws under which that party is organized, specifying for that party the provision of law or other basis for the authority of the signing persons. The certificate of merger shall set forth all of the following:

(A) The name, place of incorporation or organization, and the Secretary of State’s file number, if any, of each party to the merger, separately identifying the disappearing parties and the surviving party.

(B) If the approval of the outstanding shares of a constituent corporation was required by Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200), a statement setting forth the total number of outstanding shares of each class entitled to vote on the merger and that the principal terms of the agreement of merger were approved by a vote of the number of shares of each class entitled to vote and the percentage vote required of each class.

(C) The future effective date or time, not more than 90 days subsequent to the date of filing of the merger, if the merger is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger with the office of the Secretary of State.

(D) A statement, by each party to the merger which is a domestic corporation not organized under this division, a foreign corporation, or an other business entity, of the statutory or other basis under which that party is authorized by the laws under which it is organized to effect the merger.

(E) Any other information required to be stated in the certificate of merger by the laws under which each party to the merger is organized, including, if a domestic limited liability company is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14, if a domestic partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (b) of Section 16915, and, if a domestic limited partnership is a party to the merger, subdivision (a) of Section 15911.14.

(F) Any other details or provisions that may be desired.

Unless a future effective date or time is provided in a certificate of merger, in which event the merger shall be effective at that future effective date or time, a merger shall be effective upon the filing of the certificate of merger in the office of the Secretary of State and the several parties thereto shall be one entity. The surviving other business entity shall keep a copy of the agreement of merger at its principal place of business which, for purposes of this subdivision, shall be the office referred to in Section 17710.13 if a domestic limited liability company, at the business address specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 17710.14 if a foreign limited liability company, at the office referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 16403 if a domestic general partnership, at the business address specified in subdivision (f) of Section 16911 if a foreign partnership, at the office referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 15901.14 if a domestic
 limited partnership, or at the business address specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 15909.02 if a foreign limited partnership. Upon the request of a holder of equity securities of a party to the merger, a person with authority to do so on behalf of the surviving other business entity shall promptly deliver to that holder, a copy of the agreement of merger. A waiver by that holder of the rights provided in the foregoing sentence shall be unenforceable. If a domestic reciprocal insurer organized after 1974 to provide medical malpractice insurance is a party to the merger the agreement of merger or certificate of merger shall not be filed until there has been filed the certificate issued by the Insurance Commissioner approving the merger in accordance with Section 1555 of the Insurance Code.

(h) (1) A copy of an agreement of merger certified on or after the effective date by an official having custody
 thereof has the same force in evidence as the original and, except as against the state, is conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, the existence on the effective date of the surviving party to the merger, and the performance of the conditions necessary to the adoption of any amendment to the articles, if applicable, contained in the agreement of merger.

(2) For all purposes for a merger in which the surviving entity is a domestic other business entity and the filing of a certificate of merger is required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), a copy of the certificate of merger duly certified by the Secretary of State is conclusive evidence of the merger of the constituent corporations, either by themselves or together with the other parties to the merger, into the surviving other business entity.

(i) (1) Upon a merger
 pursuant to this section, the separate existences of the disappearing parties to the merger cease and the surviving party to the merger shall succeed, without other transfer, to all the rights and property of each of the disappearing parties to the merger and shall be subject to all the debts and liabilities of each in the same manner as if the surviving party to the merger had itself incurred them.

(2) All rights of creditors and all liens upon the property of each of the constituent corporations and other parties to the merger shall be preserved unimpaired, provided that those liens upon property of a disappearing party shall be limited to the property affected thereby immediately prior to the time the merger is effective.

(3) Any action or proceeding pending by or against any disappearing corporation or disappearing party to the merger may be prosecuted to judgment, which shall
 bind the surviving party, or the surviving party may be proceeded against or substituted in its place.

(4) If a limited partnership or a general partnership is a party to the merger, nothing in this section is intended to affect the liability a general partner of a disappearing limited partnership or general partnership may have in connection with the debts and liabilities of the disappearing limited partnership or general partnership existing prior to the time the merger is effective.

(j) (1) The merger of domestic corporations with foreign corporations or foreign other business entities in a merger in which one or more other business entities is a party shall comply with subdivision (a) and this subdivision.

(2) If the surviving party is a domestic corporation or domestic other business
 entity, the merger proceedings with respect to that party and any domestic disappearing corporation shall conform to the provisions of this section. If the surviving party is a foreign corporation or foreign other business entity, then, subject to the requirements of subdivision (c), and of Section 407 and Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1200) and Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1300), and, if applicable, corresponding provisions of the Nonprofit Corporation Law or the Consumer Cooperative Corporation Law, with respect to any domestic constituent corporations, Article 11 (commencing with Section 17711.01) of Title 2.6 with respect to any domestic constituent limited liability companies, Article 6 (commencing with Section 16601) of Chapter 5 of Title 2 with respect to any domestic constituent general partnerships, and Article 11.5 (commencing with Section 15911.20) of Chapter 5.5 of Title 2 with respect to any domestic constituent limited partnerships, the merger proceedings may be in accordance with
 the laws of the state or place of incorporation or organization of the surviving party.

(3) If the surviving party is a domestic corporation or domestic other business entity, the certificate of merger or the agreement of merger with attachments shall be filed as provided in subdivision (g) and thereupon, subject to subdivision (c) of Section 110 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (g), as is applicable, the merger shall be effective as to each domestic constituent corporation and domestic constituent other business entity.
